Massachusetts, session 194th, S836.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17I of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as so appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (b) and inserting in place
thereof the following subsection:-
(b) For the purposes of this section the following words shall, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Orthosis”, a device: (i) used to support, align, correct or prevent deformities of the body,
which may be used to eliminate, control or assist motion at a joint or body part; and (ii)
appropriately used in a person’s home or any setting in which normal life activities take place in
the community.
of 7

“Prosthetic device”, an artificial limb device to replace, in whole or in part, an arm or leg
including a device that is designed exclusively for athletic purposes.
SECTION 2. Said section 17I of said chapter 32A, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following subsection:-
(g) The commission shall provide coverage for prosthetic devices and orthotic devices,
including those designed, custom-built or fitted for a specific enrollee, for the performance of
physical activities or for an athletic purpose, as applicable, to maximize the enrollee’s ability to
ambulate, run, bike and swim and to maximize upper limb function. The coverage required
pursuant to this subsection shall include the repair or replacement of a prosthetic or orthotic
device for the performance of physical activities or for an athletic purpose.
SECTION 3. Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 10Q the following section:-
10R. (a) For the purposes of this section the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Orthotic device”, a device: (i) used to support, align, correct or prevent deformities of
the body, which may be used to eliminate, control or assist motion at a joint or body part; and (ii)
appropriately used in a person’s home or any setting in which normal life activities take place in
the community.
“Prosthetic device”, an artificial limb device to replace, in whole or in part, an arm or leg
including a device that is designed exclusively for athletic purposes.
of 7

(b) The division shall provide coverage for prosthetic and orthotic devices including the
repair or replacement of prosthetic or orthotic devices to eligible MassHealth members under the
same terms and conditions that apply to other durable medical equipment. The coverage required
by this section shall be subject to the terms and conditions applicable to other benefits.
(c) The division shall provide coverage for prosthetic devices and orthotic devices,
including those designed, custom-built or fitted for a specific enrollee, for the performance of
physical activities or for an athletic purpose, as applicable, to maximize the enrollee’s
ability to ambulate, run, bike and swim and to maximize upper limb function. The coverage
required pursuant to this subsection shall include the repair or replacement of a prosthetic or
orthotic device for the performance of physical activities or for an athletic purpose.
(d) Eligible MassHealth members shall be required to provide a written prescription
signed by a licensed physician or an independent nurse practitioner. The prescription must be
written on the prescriber's prescription form and must include the following information:
(i) the member's name and address;
(ii) the member’s MassHealth identification number;
(iii) specific identification of the prescribed item;
(iv) medical justification for the use of the item, including the member’s diagnosis;
(v) the prescriber's address and telephone number; and
(vi) the date on which the prescription was signed by the prescriber.
of 7

SECTION 4. Section 47Z of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
(b) For the purposes of this section the following words shall, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Orthosis”, a device: (i) used to support, align, correct or prevent deformities of the body,
which may be used to eliminate, control or assist motion at a joint or body part; and (ii)
appropriately used in a person’s home or any setting in which normal life activities take place in
the community.
“Prosthetic device”, an artificial limb device to replace, in whole or in part, an arm or leg
including a device that is designed exclusively for athletic purposes.
SECTION 5. Said section 47Z of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following subsection:-
(h) Any such policy shall provide coverage for prosthetic devices and orthoses, including
those designed, custom-built or fitted for a specific enrollee, for the performance of physical
activities or for an athletic purpose, as applicable, to maximize the enrollee’s ability to ambulate,
run, bike and swim and to maximize upper limb function. The coverage required pursuant to this
subsection shall include the repair or replacement of a prosthetic or orthotic device for the
performance of physical activities or for an athletic purpose.
SECTION 6. Section 8AA of chapter 176A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof the following
subsection:-
of 7

(b) For the purposes of this section the following words shall, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Orthosis”, a device: (i) used to support, align, correct or prevent deformities of the body,
which may be used to eliminate, control or assist motion at a joint or body part; and (ii)
appropriately used in a person’s home or any setting in which normal life activities take place in
the community.
“Prosthetic device”, an artificial limb device to replace, in whole or in part, an arm or leg
including a device that is designed exclusively for athletic purposes.
SECTION 7. Said section 8AA of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following subsection:-
(h) Any such contract shall be required to provide coverage for prosthetic devices and
orthotic devices, including those designed, custom-built or fitted for a specific enrollee, for the
performance of physical activities or for an athletic purpose, as applicable, to maximize the
enrollee’s ability to ambulate, run, bike and swim and to maximize upper limb function. The
coverage required pursuant to this subsection shall include the repair or replacement of a
prosthetic or orthotic device for the performance of physical activities or for an athletic purpose.
SECTION 8. Section 4AA of chapter 176B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof the following
subsection:-
(b) For the purposes of this section the following words shall, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
of 7

“Orthosis”, a device: (i) used to support, align, correct or prevent deformities of the body,
which may be used to eliminate, control or assist motion at a joint or body part; and (ii)
appropriately used in a person’s home or any setting in which normal life activities take place in
the community.
“Prosthetic device”, an artificial limb device to replace, in whole or in part, an arm or leg
including a device that is designed exclusively for athletic purposes.
SECTION 9. Said section 4AA of said chapter 176B, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following subsection:-
(h) Any such certificate shall be required to provide coverage for prosthetic devices and
100 orthotic devices, including those designed, custom-built or fitted for a specific enrollee, for the
101 performance of physical activities or for an athletic purpose, as applicable, to maximize the
102 enrollee’s ability to ambulate, run, bike and swim and to maximize upper limb function. The
103 coverage required pursuant to this subsection shall include the repair or replacement of a
104 prosthetic or orthotic device for the performance of physical activities or for an athletic purpose.
105 SECTION 10. Section 4S of chapter 176G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
106 hereby amended by striking out subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof the following
107 subsection:-
108 (b) For the purposes of this section the following words shall, unless the context clearly
109 requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
110 “Orthosis”, a device: (i) used to support, align, correct or prevent deformities of the body,
111 which may be used to eliminate, control or assist motion at a joint or body part; and (ii)
of 7

112 appropriately used in a person’s home or any setting in which normal life activities take place in
113 the community.
114 “Prosthetic device”, an artificial limb device to replace, in whole or in part, an arm or leg
115 including a device that is designed exclusively for athletic purposes.
116 SECTION 11. Said section 4S of said chapter 176G, as so appearing, is hereby further
117 amended by adding the following subsection:-
118 (h) A health maintenance contract shall be required to provide coverage for prosthetic
119 devices and orthotic devices, including those designed, custom-built or fitted for a specific
120 enrollee, for the performance of physical activities or for an athletic purpose, as applicable, to
121 maximize the enrollee’s ability to ambulate, run, bike and swim and to maximize upper limb
122 function. The coverage required pursuant to this subsection shall include the repair or
123 replacement of a prosthetic or orthotic device for the performance of physical activities or for an
124 athletic purpose.
of 7